Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-507
Secretary of State; oaths; acknowledgments; fees.

The Secretary of State shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations, acknowledgments and proofs of the execution of deeds, mortgages, powers of attorney, and other instruments in writing to be used or recorded in this state. He shall be allowed such fee as is provided for a notary public in such cases made and provided.

Laws 1877, § 9, p. 199;

R.S.1913, § 5573;

C.S.1922, § 4877;

C.S.1929, § 84-505;

R.S.1943, § 84-507.